trunk/apertium-tg-fa/apertium-tg-fa.fa.dix.xml
    <pardef n="گذ/شتن__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>رید</l>
          <r>شتن<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ر</l>
          <r>شتن<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>شتیم</l>
          <r>شتن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>شتم</l>
          <r>شتن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>شتید</l>
          <r>شتن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>شتی</l>
          <r>شتن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>شتند</l>
          <r>شتن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>شت</l>
          <r>شتن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ریم</l>
          <r>شتن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>رم</l>
          <r>شتن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>رید</l>
          <r>شتن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ری</l>
          <r>شتن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>رند</l>
          <r>شتن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>رد</l>
          <r>شتن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ریم</l>
          <r>شتن<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>رم</l>
          <r>شتن<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>رید</l>
          <r>شتن<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ری</l>
          <r>شتن<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>رند</l>
          <r>شتن<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>رد</l>
          <r>شتن<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="کاشتن"><par n="P__prefixes"/><i>کا</i><par n="گذ/شتن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="گذاشتن"><par n="P__prefixes"/><i>گذا</i><par n="گذ/شتن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="نگاشتن"><par n="P__prefixes"/><i>نگا</i><par n="گذ/شتن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="گذشتن"><par n="P__prefixes"/><i>گذ</i><par n="گذ/شتن__vblex"/></e>
